ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 釣り > 釣針外し: 万能針セット; バイトドリル; バイトガン; ボイリードリル; ボイリーヘアエクステンダー; ボイリーローリングテーブル; ボイリーストップキャップ; ボイリーストップ; コーティング除去ツール; コーンボイリーストップ; カッティングプライヤー; ファインリップクローズニードル; フィッシュグリップ; 釣り用フォーセップ; 釣り用ニッパー・ラインカッター; フライタイイングハサミ; フライタイイングツールセット; ヘアエクステンダーストップ; ヘビーリップクローズニードル; マルチプルツール; ペレットストップ; ストリンガーニードル; スローイングスティック
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Horgászat > Horgászhorog-eltávolító eszközök: Univerzális tűkészletek; Csalifúrók; Csalifegyverek; Bojlifúrók; Bojlis szőrhosszabbítók; Bojlis görgőasztalok; Bojlis megállítósapkák; Bojlis megállítók; Bevonateltávolító eszközök; Kukoricabojlis megállítók; Vágófogók; Finom ajakzáró tűk; Halszájfogók (Lip grip); Horgász érfogók és csipeszek; Horgász zsinórvágók és csipeszek; Légykötő ollók; Légykötő szerszámkészletek; Szőrhosszabbító megállítók; Nehéz ajakzáró tűk; Többfunkciós húzóeszközök; Pelletmegállítók; Zsinórtűk; Dobóbotok
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Fisking > Fjerningsverktøy for fiskekroker: Universalnålesett; Agndriller; Agnpistoler; Boilie-driller; Boilie-hårforlengere; Boilie-rullebord; Boilie-endehetter; Boilie-ender; Verktøy for fjerning av belegg; Maisboilie-ender; Skjæretenger; Fine Lip Close-nåler; Fiskegripere; Krokuttrekkere og peanger; Seneklippere og snørekniver; Fluebindingssakser; Verktøysett for fluebinding; Hårforlengerstopper; Heavy Lip Close-nåler; Universaltrekkverktøy; Pelletstopper; Stringer-nåler; Kastepinner
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Angeln > Werkzeuge zum Entfernen des Angelhakens: Allzweck-Nadelsets; Köderbohrer; Köderpistolen; Boiliebohrer; Boilie-Haarverlängerungen; Boilie-Rolltische; Boilie-Stoppkappen; Boilie-Stopps; Außenschichtentfernungswerkzeuge; Corn Boilie-Stopps; Schneidzangen; Feine Lippenschließnadeln; Fischgreifer; Angelzangen & Klemmen; Angelscheren & Schnurschneider; Fliegenbindeschere; Fliegenbinde-Werkzeugsets; Haarverlängerungsstopps; Schwere Lippenschließnadeln; Multi-Ziehwerkzeuge; Pelletstopps; Fadennadeln; Wurfstöcke
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Rybolov > Nástroje na odstránenie rybárskeho háčika: Viacúčelové súpravy ihiel; Vrtáky na návnady; Výtlačné pištole; Vrtáky na boilie; Nadstavené vlasy na boilie; Pohyblivé tácky na boilie; Zarážky na boilie; Zarážky na boilie; Nástroje na odstraňovanie povlaku; Zarážky na kukuričné boilie; Rezacie kliešte; Tenké ihly na zatvorenie pier; Kliešte na rybie pysky; Rybárske kliešte a hemostaty; Rybárske kliešte a nožnice na vlasce; Nožnice na viazanie mušiek; Súpravy nástrojov na viazanie mušiek; Zarážky na nadstavené vlasy; Hrubé ihly na zatvorenie pier; Univerzálne ťahacie nástroje; Peletové zarážky; Navliekacie ihly; Vrhacie kobry
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Câu cá > Dụng cụ tách lưỡi câu: Bộ kim đa năng; Kim khoan mồi câu; Súng mồi; Kim khoan boilie; Bộ nối dài lông boilie; Bàn lăn boilie; Chụp chặn boilie; Hạt chặn boilie; Dụng cụ tháo lớp phủ; Hạt chặn boilie hình nón; Kìm cắt; Kim đóng miệng nhỏ; Kẹp môi cá; Kẹp gắp & kẹp cầm máu câu cá; Kềm & dao cắt dây câu; Kéo buộc ruồi; Bộ dụng cụ buộc ruồi; Chặn nối dài lông; Kim đóng miệng lớn; Dụng cụ kéo đa năng; Hạt chặn gỗ; Kim chọc mồi; Gậy ném
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Pesca > Strumenti per rimuovere gli ami da pesca: Set di aghi multiuso; Esercizi con esca; Pistole ad esca; Perforatore Boilie; Estensori per capelli Boilie; Tavoli per arrotolare Boile; Tappi ferma Boile; Ferma Boile; Strumenti per la rimozione del rivestimento; Ferma Boile mais; Pinze da taglio; Aghi sottili con chiusura a labbro; Pinze grip per pesci; Pinze e pinze emostatiche da pesca; Tronchesine e tagliafilo da pesca; Forbici per mosche; Set di strumenti per mosche; Arresto per estensore capelli; Aghi pesanti con chiusura a labbro; Strumenti multiestrazione; Arresti pellet; Aghi Stringer; Bastoni da lancio
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Kalastus > Kalastuskoukun poistotyökalut: Yleiskäyttöiset neulasetit; Syöttiporat; Syöttipistoolit; Boilieporat; Boiliehiusjatkeet; Boiliepyöröpöydät; Boiliepysäytyskorkit; Boiliepysäyttimet; Pinnoitteen poistotyökalut; Maissiboiliepysäyttimet; Leikkauspihdit; Hieno sulkuneula; Kalapihdit; Kalastuspihdit ja suonipihdit; Siimaleikkurit; Perhonsidontasakset; Perhonsidontatyökalusarjat; Hiusjatkeiden pysäyttimet; Leveä sulkuneula; Monivetotyökalut; Pellettipysäyttimet; Langanpujotin; Heittoputket
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Pesca > Ferramentas de remoção de anzóis de pesca: Conjuntos de agulhas multifunções; Broca para isco; Pistolas de isco; Brocas para isco de boilie; Extensores de fio para isco de boilie; Mesas para enrolar isco de boilie; Tampas para isco de boilie; Bloqueios para isco de boilie; Ferramentas de remoção de revestimento; Boias para isco de boilie; Alicates para cortar; Agulhas finas para isco; Alicates grip de pesca; Pinças e fórceps de pesca; Corta-fios e corta-linhas de pesca; Tesoura para amarrar moscas; Conjuntos de ferramentas para amarrar moscas; Bloqueios para extensor de fio; Agulhas grossas para isco; Ferramentas para puxar; Interruptores de pellets; Agulhas de longarina; Paus de arremesso
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Ribolov > Alati za skidanje riba s udica: Višenamjenski setovi igala; Bušilice za mamac; Pištolji za mamac; Svrdla za boile; Stoperi za dlaku za boile; Roler za boile; Kapice za stopere; Stoperi za boile; Alati za uklanjanje premaza; Stoperi za boile u obliku kukuruza; Kliješta za rezanje; Igle za zatvaranje usta; Hvataljke za usne ribe; Pincete i hemostati za ribolov; Kliješta i rezači najlona za ribolov; Škarice za ribolov; Set škarica za ribolov; Stoperi za dlaku; Teške igle za zatvaranje usta; Alati za višestruko povlačenje; Stoperi za pelete; Dugačka igla za PVA; Štapovi za ribolov za zabacivanje
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Vissen > Vishaakverwijderaars: Universele naaldensets; Aasboren; Aasgeweren; Boilieboren; Boiliehaarverlengers; Boilieroltafels; Boiliestopdoppen; Boiliestoppen; Coatingverwijderaars; Boiliemaïsstoppen; Snijtangen; Fijne lipsluitende naalden; Visgrippers; Vistangen en onthakingstangen; Visknippers en lijnsnijders; Vliegbindscharen; Vliegbindsets; Haarverlengerstoppen; Zware lipsluitende naalden; Multitrekkers; Pelletstoppen; Draadnaalden; Werpstokken
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Balıkçılık > Olta Çıkarma Aletleri: Çok Amaçlı İğne Setleri; Yem Matkapları; Yem Silahları; Boilie Matkaplar; Boilie Saç Uzatıcılar; Boilie Tekerlekli Masalar; Boilie Durdurma Kapakları; Boilie Durakları; Kaplama Temizleme Aletleri; Mısır Boilie Durakları; Kesme Penseleri; İnce Dudak Kapatma İğneleri; Balık dudak tutucuları; Balıkçılık pensleri ve hemostatları; Olta makasları ve misina kesicileri; Sinek Bağlama Makası; Sinek Bağlama Alet Setleri; Saç Uzatma Durakları; Ağır Dudak Kapatma İğneleri; Çoklu Çekme Aletleri; Pelet Durakları; Stringer İğneleri; Fırlatma Sopaları
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Fishing > Fishing Hook Removal Tools: All-Purpose Needle Sets; Bait Drills; Bait Guns; Boilie Drills; Boilie Hair Extenders; Boilie Rolling Tables; Boilie Stop Caps; Boilie Stops; Coating Removal Tools; Corn Boilie Stops; Cutting Pliers; Fine Lip Close Needles; Fish Lip Grippers; Fishing Forceps & Hemostats; Fishing Nippers & Line Cutters; Fly Tying Scissors; Fly Tying Tool Sets; Hair Extender Stops; Heavy Lip Close Needles; Multi Pull Tools; Pellet Stops; Stringer Needles; Throwing Sticks
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Fiskeri > Værktøj til fjernelse af fiskekroge: Multinålesæt; Agnbor; Agnpistoler; Boilie-bor; Boilie-hårforlængere; Boilie-rulleborde; Boilie-stophætter; Boilie-stop; Værktøj til fjernelse af belægning; Majsboilie-stop; Skæretang; Fine fluebindernåle; Lipgrips til fisk; Arterietænger og pincetter til fiskeri; Lineklippere og -sakse til fiskeri; Fluebindingssaks; Fluebindingsværktøjssæt; Hårforlængerstop; Kraftige fluebindernåle; Multiværktøj; Pillestopper; Strengnåle; Kastepinde
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Pesca > Sacanzuelos: Juegos de agujas multiusos; Brocas de cebo; Pistolas de cebo; Taladros de boilie; Extensores de pelo de boilie; Mesas rodantes de boilie; Tapones para boilies; Topes de boilies; Herramientas de eliminación de revestimiento; Topes de boilies de maíz; Alicates de corte; Agujas de cierre de labios finos; Pinzas de agarre para peces; Fórceps y pinzas hemostáticas de pesca; Alicates y cortadores de línea de pesca; Tijeras para atar moscas; Juegos de herramientas para atar moscas; Topes de extensión de cabello; Agujas pesadas para cerrar labios; Herramientas multitirón; Topes de pellets; Agujas de puntal; Palos lanzadores
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Rybołówstwo > Narzędzia do usuwania haczyków: Uniwersalne zestawy igieł; Wiertła z przynętą; Pistolety na przynęty; Boilie Drills; Przedłużacze żyłek Boilie; Rolownice do kulek; Nasadki Boilie; Ograniczniki Boilie; Narzędzia do usuwania powłok; Przynęta imitująca kukurydzę; Szczypce tnące; Igły cienkie do przynęt; Chwytaki wędkarskie; Kleszcze i szczypce wędkarskie; Obcinaczki i szczypce do żyłek; Nożyczki do wiązania much; Zestawy narzędzi do wiązania much; Ograniczniki przedłużacza żyłek; Igły grube do przynęt; Narzędzia wielofunkcyjne; Stopery do kulek; Igły Stringer; Rurki rzutowe
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Рыбалка > Инструменты для извлечения рыболовных крючков: Универсальные наборы насадочных игл; Сверла для приманок; Пистолеты для гелевых приманок; Сверла для бойлов; Удлинители волоса для бойлов; Доски для раскатки бойлов; Заглушки для стопоров для бойлов; Стопоры для бойлов; Инструменты для снятия оплетки поводкового материала; Стопоры для бойлов в виде зерна кукурузы; Рыболовные кусачки; Тонкие насадочные иглы; Липгрипы (челюстные захваты); Рыболовные зажимы; Кусачки и ножницы для лески; Ножницы для вязания мушек; Наборы инструментов для вязания мушек; Стопоры для удлинителей волоса; Толстые насадочные иглы; Мультитулы для затягивания узлов; Стопоры для пеллетса; Стрингерные иглы; Кобры для заброса приманок
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ψάρεμα > Εργαλεία αφαίρεσης αγκίστρων ψαρέματος: Σετ βελόνες για όλες τις χρήσεις; Τρυπάνια για δολώματα; Πιστόλια για δολώματα; Τρυπάνια Boilie; Βελτιωτικά Boilie Hair; Τραπέζια ρολαρίσματος Boilie; Καλύμματα στοπ Boilie; Στοπ Boilie; Εργαλεία αφαίρεσης επίστρωσης; Στοπ καλαμποκιού Boilie; Πενσάκια; Bελόνες κλεισίματος λεπτών χειλιών; Λαβίδες χειλιών ψαριού (Lip Grippers); Λαβίδες & αιμοστατικά ψαρέματος; Πενσάκια & κόφτες πετονιάς ψαρέματος; Ψαλίδι δεσίματος μύγας; Σετ εργαλείων δεσίματος μύγας; Στοπ επέκτασης τριχών; Βελόνες κλεισίματος βαριών χειλιών; Εργαλεία πολλαπλής έλξης; Στοπ πέλλετ; Βελόνες Stringer; Καλάμια βολών
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 釣魚 > 魚鉤移除工具: 通用針組; 誘餌鑽頭; 誘餌槍; 魚餌塞鑽頭; 魚餌延長線; 魚餌模; 魚餌止動帽; 魚餌止動塞; 塗層去除工具; 玉米魚餌止動塞; 剪鉗; 細脫鉤針; 控魚器; 釣魚取鉤鉗; 剪線鉗與切線器; 飛繩剪; 飛繩工具組; 子線止動塞; 粗脫鉤針; 多功能拉鉤工具; 太空豆; 穿線針; 助拋桿
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การตกปลา > เครื่องมือถอดเบ็ดตกปลา: ชุดเข็มอเนกประสงค์; ที่เจาะเหยื่อ; ปืนยิงเหยื่อ; ที่เจาะเหยื่อแบบอาหารผสมต้ม; ตัวยืดสายเหยื่ออาหารผสมต้ม; โต๊ะกลิ้งเหยื่ออาหารผสมต้ม; ฝาปิดที่กั้นเหยื่ออาหารผสมต้ม; ที่กั้นเหยื่ออาหารผสมต้ม; เครื่องมือกำจัดสารเคลือบ; ที่กั้นเหยื่อชนิดข้าวโพดต้ม; คีมหนีบตัด; เข็มปิดปากงานละเอียด; กริปเปอร์คีบปากปลา; คีมคีบและคีมปลดเบ็ดตกปลา; กรรไกรและที่ตัดสายเอ็นตกปลา; กรรไกรผูกเหยื่อแมลง; ชุดเครื่องมือผูกเหยื่อแมลง; ที่กั้นส่วนขยายขน; เข็มปิดปากหนัก; เครื่องมือดึงแบบมัลติ; ที่กั้นอาหารเม็ด; เข็มสน; ไม้ขว้าง
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Риболов > Инструменти за премахване на риболовни куки: Универсални комплекти игли за стръв; Свредла за стръв; Пистолети за стръв; Свредла за протеинови топчета; Удължители за протеинови топчета; Табли за протеинови топчета; Капачки за стопери на протеинови топчета; Стопери за протеинови топчета; Инструменти за премахване на покритие; Царевични стопери за протеинови топчета; Режещи клещи; Игли за малка стръв; Щипки за рибни устни; Инструменти за изваждане на куки; Риболовни клещи и резачки за корди; Ножици за връзване на мухи; Комплекти инструменти за връзване на мухи; Стопери за удължители за монтаж „на косъм“; Игли за голяма стръв; Инструменти за многократно издърпване; Стопери за монтаж с пелети; Игли за стъв Stringer; Пръчки за хвърляне
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Rybaření > Vyprošťovače rybářských háčků: Sady univerzálních jehel; Vrtáky na návnady; Pistole na návnady; Vrtáky na nástrahy (boilie); Prodlužovací zarážky na nástrahy (boilie); Rolovací stolky pro výrobu boilií; Zarážky na nástrahy (boilie); Stoppery na nástrahy (boilie); Nářadí pro odstraňování obalů; Boilie zarážky na kukuřici; Kleště/nůžky; Tenké jehly s uzavíratelným hrotem pro malé nebo křehké návnady; Rybářské vylovovací kleště; Rybářské peány; Štípátka a řezače rybářských vlasců; Nůžky na vázání mušek; Sady nářadí pro vázání mušek; Prodlužovací zarážky; Jehla s uzavíratelným hrotem na tvrdší nástrahy; Multifunkční nástroje pro utahování uzlů; Zarážky na pelety; Jehly na výrobu stringerů; Vrhací tyče
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Fiske > Borttagningsverktyg för fiskekrokar: Nåluppsättningar för alla ändamål; Betesborrar; Betespistoler; Boilie-borrar; Boilie-hårförlängare; Boilie-rullbord; Boilie-stopplattor; Boilie-stoppar; Verktyg för borttagning av beläggning; Majsboilie-stoppar; Skärtänger; Tunna läppstängningsnålar; Lipgrips; Fisketänger och peanger; Linklippare och avbitare för fiske; Saxar för flugbindning; Verktygsset för flugbindning; Hårförlängarstopp; Grova läppstängningsnålar; Multidragverktyg; Pelletsstoppar; Stringernålar; Kastpinnar
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Pesca > Ferramentas para remover anzol: Conjuntos de agulhas multifuncionais; Brocas para isca; Armas para isca; Brocas Boilie; Extensores de fio Boilie; Mesas rolantes Boilie; Tampas de bloqueio de Boilie; Bloqueios de Boilie; Ferramentas de remoção de revestimento; Bloqueios de Boilie tipo milho; Alicates de corte; Agulhas finas tipo lábio fechado; Alicates pega-peixe; Pinças e alicates de pesca; Cortadores e tesouras de linha de pesca; Tesoura para amarrar moscas; Conjuntos de ferramentas para amarrar moscas; Bloqueios do extensor de fio; Agulhas pesadas tipo lábio fechado; Ferramentas multipuxadores; Paradas de pellets; Agulhas de longarina; Varas de arremesso
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Žvejyba > Kabliukų ištraukimo įrankiai: Universalūs adatų rinkiniai; Masalo grąžtai; Masalo pistoletai; Boilio grąžtai; Boilio gijų ilgintuvai; Boilio sukimo stalai; Boilio stabdiklių dangteliai; Boilio stabdikliai; Dangos nuėmimo įrankiai; Kukurūzų boilio stabdikliai; Kirpimo replės; Plonos ylos uždaroma ausele; Žuvies lūpų suėmėjai; Žvejybos žnyplės ir hemostatai; Žvejybos žnyplės ir valų kirpikliai; Muselių rišimo žirklės; Muselių rišimo įrankių rinkiniai; Gijų ilgintuvų stabdikliai; Storos ylos uždaroma ausele; Universalūs traukimo įrankiai; Granulių stabdikliai; Vėrimo adatos; Mėtomosios lazdos
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Pêche > Outils d'extraction des hameçons: Ensembles d'aiguilles tout usage; Forets à appâts; Pistolets à appâts; Forets à bouillettes; Extensions pour bouillettes; Tables roulantes pour bouillettes; Bouchons d'arrêt pour bouillettes; Arrêt pour bouillettes; Outils de retrait de revêtement; Arrêts de bouillette de maïs; Pinces coupantes; Aiguilles à épisser fines; Pinces à poisson; Pinces dégorgeoires et hémostatiques; Coupe-fils de pêche; Ciseaux pour montage des mouches; Ensembles d'outils pour attacher des mouches; Arrêts d'extension; Aiguilles à épisser lourdes; Outils à traction multiple; Arrêts de pellets; Aiguilles à chaîne à poisson; Bâtons de lancer
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 낚시 > 낚싯바늘 제거기: 다용도 바늘 세트; 미끼 드릴; 미끼 건; 보일리 미끼 드릴; 보일리 헤어 익스텐더; 보일리 롤링 테이블; 보일리 미끼 스토퍼 캡; 보일리 미끼 스토퍼; 코팅 제거 도구; 옥수수 보일리 미끼 스토퍼; 절단용 펜치; 파인 립 클로즈 바늘; 물고기 립 그립퍼; 낚시 포셉 및 플라이어; 낚시 니퍼 및 라인 커터; 낚시 타잉 가위; 낚시 타잉 도구 세트; 헤어 익스텐더 스토퍼; 헤비 립 클로즈 바늘; 멀티 풀러 공구; 펠렛 스토퍼; 스트링거 바늘; 미끼 던지는 막대도구
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 钓鱼 > 鱼钩拆除工具: 通用针套装; 诱饵钻头; 诱饵枪; 小球状鲤鱼鱼饵钻头; 小球状鲤鱼鱼饵饵丝延长器; 小球状鲤鱼鱼饵摇摆台; 小球状鲤鱼鱼饵止动帽; 小球状鲤鱼鱼饵止动装置; 涂层去除工具; 玉米小球状鲤鱼鱼饵止动装置; 剪钳; 细唇闭合针; 控鱼器; 钓鱼摘钩钳和止血钳; 钓鱼剪线钳; 捆绑鱼饵剪刀; 捆绑鱼饵工具套装; 饵丝延长器止动装置; 厚唇闭合针; 多次拉力工具; 球状止动装置; 纵梁针; 投掷棒
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Ribolov > Orodja za odstranjevanje ribiških trnkov: Večnamenski kompleti igel; Svedri za vabe; Pištole za vabe; Svedri za boilije; Podaljševalniki dlak za boilije; Mize za oblikovanje boilijev; Čepi za štoperje za boilije; Štoperji za boilije; Orodja za odstranjevanje premaza; Koruzni štoperji za boilije; Klešče za rezanje; Igle za pritrditev tanke vabe; Prijemala za ribje ustnice; Klešče za odstranjevanje trnkov; Ščipalke za laks in rezalniki vrvice; Škarje za vezavo muh; Kompleti orodij za vezavo muh; Štoperji za podaljševalnike dlak; Igle za pritrditev debelejše vabe; Večnamenska orodja za vlečenje; Štoperji za pelete; Stringer igle; Palice za metanje vab
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Pescuit > Unelte pentru îndepărtarea cârligelor de pescuit: Seturi de cârlige universale; Burghie pentru momeală; Pistoale pentru momeală; Burghie pentru momeală boilie; Prelungitoare de fir de păr boilie; Mese pentru rulat boilie; Dopuri boilie; Opritori boilie; Instrumente de îndepărtare a stratului de acoperire; Opritori boilie porumb; Clești de tăiat; Ace închidere subțiri; Clești pentru prins peștele de buze; Pensete și hemostați pentru pescuit; Clești și tăietoare de fir pentru pescuit; Foarfeci pentru legarea muștelor; Seturi de foarfeci pentru legarea muștelor; Opritori prelungitoare cu fire de păr; Ace închidere groase; Instrumente multifuncționale; Opritori pentru pelete; Ace croșetă; Bastoane de nădire